Utah statutes.
40-2-104.   Rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules necessary to implement this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 113, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

